North Carolina, session 2025, HB990.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 42-46 reads as rewritten:
"§ 42-46. Authorized fees, costs, and expenses.
(a) Late Fee. – In all residential rental agreements in which a definite time for the
payment of the rent is fixed, the parties may agree to a late fee not inconsistent with the provisions
of this subsection, to be chargeable only if any rental payment is five days or more late. If the
rent:
(1) Is due in monthly installments, a landlord may charge a late fee not to exceed
fifteen dollars ($15.00) or five percent (5%) of the monthly rent, whichever is
greater.
(2) Is due in weekly installments, a landlord may charge a late fee not to exceed
four dollars ($4.00) or five percent (5%) of the weekly rent, whichever is
greater.
(3) Repealed by Session Laws 2009-279, s. 4, effective October 1, 2009, and
applicable to leases entered into on or after that date.
(b) A late fee under subsection (a) of this section may be imposed only one time for each
late rental payment. A late fee for a specific late rental payment may not be deducted from a
subsequent rental payment so as to cause the subsequent rental payment to be in default.
(b1) A late fee under subsection (a) of this section may only be collected by the lessor if
the lessor provides written notice to the lessee prior to collecting the fee. The notice shall be
delivered by hand, mail, or electronic means as agreed upon in the rental agreement. The notice
shall inform the lessee that a late fee will be or has been assessed for a past due rental payment
not received by the later of (i) five days after the due date specified in the rental agreement or (ii)
the number of days after the due date specified in the rental agreement for imposing a late fee,
provided that number is not less than five days. The notice shall specify the amount of the late
fee and, if the fee has been assessed, the date it was imposed.
…."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to late fees
imposed on or after that date.
*H990-v-1*